Utah statutes.
17B-1-402.   Annexation of area outside local district.

(1)  An area outside the boundaries of a local district may be annexed to the local district, as provided in this part, in order to provide to the area a service that the local district provides.

(2)  The area proposed to be annexed:

(a)  may consist of one or more noncontiguous areas; and

(b)  need not be adjacent to the boundaries of the proposed annexing local district.

(3)  With respect to a local district in the creation of which an election was not required under Subsection 17B-1-214(3)(d):

(a)  an unincorporated area of a county may not be annexed to the local district unless, after annexation, at least a majority of the unincorporated area of the county will be included in the local district; and

(b)  the annexation of any part of an area within a municipality shall include all of the area within the municipality.

(4)  A local district may not annex an area located within a project area described in a project area plan adopted by the military installation development authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act, without the authority's approval.

